dictionaries/ru-ru.aff
SFX A Y 93
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÕÀ           ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÍÕ          [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÍ           [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÊ           [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÇÏ          [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÅ           [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÏÀ           [^Ã]ÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÅÍÕ          ÃÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÅÍ           ÃÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÅÊ           ÃÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÅÇÏ          ÃÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÅÅ           ÃÙÊ
SFX A   ÙÊ   ÁÑ           ÙÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÙÍÉ          [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÙÍ           [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÙÈ           [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÙÅ           [^ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÕÀ           ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÏÍÕ          ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÏÍ           ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÏÇÏ          ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÏÅ           ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÉÍÉ          [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÉÍ           [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÉÈ           [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÉÅ           [ÇÈËÖÛÝÞ]ÏÊ
SFX A   ÏÊ   ÁÑ           ÏÊ
SFX A   Ê    ÍÉ           ÙÊ
SFX A   Ê    ÍÉ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    ÍÉ           [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    Í            ÙÊ
SFX A   Ê    Í            [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    Í            [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    È            ÙÊ
SFX A   Ê    È            [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    È            [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    Å            ÙÊ
SFX A   Ê    Å            [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    Å            [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   Ê    À            ÏÊ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÕÀÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÉÍÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÉÍÉÓÑ        [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÉÈÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÉÅÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÍÕÓÑ        [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÍÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÊÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÇÏÓÑ        [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÅÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÅÀÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊÓÑ ÁÑÓÑ         [ÛÝ]ÉÊÓÑ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÕÀ           [ÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÕÀ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÑÑ           [ÅÎ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÍÕ          [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÍ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÊ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÇÏ          [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÅ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÏÀ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÍÕ          [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÍ           [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÊ           [ÅÎÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÇÏ          [ÅÎÒÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÅ           [ÅÎÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÅÀ           [ÅÎÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÁÑ           [ÖÛÝÞ]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÁÑ           [ÇÈË]ÉÊ
SFX A   ÉÊ   ÀÀ           [ÅÎ]ÉÊ
SFX A   Å    ÍÉ           [ÉÙ]Å
SFX A   Å    Í            [ÉÙ]Å
SFX A   Å    È            [ÉÙ]Å
SFX A   0    ÙÍÉ          ×
SFX A   0    ÙÍÉ          ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÙÍ           ×
SFX A   0    ÙÍ           ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÙÈ           ×
SFX A   0    ÙÈ           ÉÎ
SFX A   0    Ù            ×
SFX A   0    Ù            ÉÎ
SFX A   0    Õ            ×
SFX A   0    Õ            ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÏÍÕ          ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÏÍ           ×
SFX A   0    ÏÍ           ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÏÊ           ×
SFX A   0    ÏÊ           ÉÎ
SFX A   0    ÏÇÏ          ÉÎ
SFX A   0    Ï            ×
SFX A   0    Ï            ÉÎ
SFX A   0    Á            ×
SFX A   0    Á            ÉÎ
